Delaware, session 153, HB219.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Chapter 6, Title 1 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 610. Diwali Day In accordance with the official day recognized by the Indian government, the 15th day of the Hindu lunisolar month of Kartik is designated "Diwali Day."